Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3584
Hospital authority; objections; contents.

All electors residing within the boundaries of the proposed authority who have not signed the petitions and who may object to the organization of the authority or to any one or more of the proposed trustees shall, not less than five days prior to the date set for the hearing on the petitions, file with the county clerk any such objection in writing, stating (1) why such hospital authority should not be organized and declared a public corporation in this state, (2) why the territory comprising the authority should be enlarged, decreased or otherwise changed, and (3) their objections to any one or more of the proposed trustees.

Laws 1971, LB 54, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.79.